Ohio, session 136, SB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4501.41 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4501.41. (A) The registrar of motor vehicles or a 7
deputy registrar shall ask each person conducting a transaction 8
in person at the bureau of motor vehicles or at a deputy 9
registrar office if the person desires the registrar or deputy 10
registrar to check if the person has unclaimed funds under 11
Chapter 169. of the Revised Code. If the person requests the 12
registrar or deputy registrar to check for unclaimed funds, the 13
registrar or deputy registrar shall do so using the person's 14
name and any other relevant information available. 15
(B) The registrar or deputy registrar that conducts a 16
check under division (A) of this section shall inform the person 17
whether or not the person may have unclaimed funds and, if so, 18
ask whether the person would like assistance submitting a claim 19

S. B. No. 243 Page 2
As Introduced
for the unclaimed funds. If the person indicates that they would 20
like assistance, the registrar or deputy registrar shall assist 21
the person with the submission of a claim for unclaimed funds. 22
For purposes of submitting the claim, the registrar or deputy 23
registrar shall utilize information in the possession of the 24
registrar or deputy registrar and any information provided to 25
the registrar or deputy registrar by the person requesting 26
assistance. 27
(C) The registrar, in conjunction with the director of 28
commerce, may adopt any policies, procedures, or forms necessary 29
to implement this section. 30